dictionaries/sk_SK/src/Slovak.aff
SFX c Y 190 # vzor pre živ. pod.mená. ak N plurál je -ia
SFX c   ec          če         ec is:vocative
SFX c   0           ho         [éi] is:genitive
SFX c   us          a          [^ú]..us is:genitive
SFX c   0           a          úlius is:genitive
SFX c   as          a          [^el]as is:genitive
SFX c   0           a          [el]as is:genitive
SFX c   es          a          [^hxz]es is:genitive
SFX c   0           a          [hxz]es is:genitive
SFX c   0           a          [^h]os is:genitive
SFX c   os          a          hos is:genitive
SFX c   0           a          is is:genitive
SFX c   ec          ca         ec is:genitive
SFX c   0           a          [^e]c is:genitive
SFX c   on          na         zon is:genitive
SFX c   o           a          o is:genitive
SFX c   0           a          [inp]er is:genitive
SFX c   er          ra         [^inp]er is:genitive
SFX c   er          rov        [^inp]er is:genitive
SFX c   or          ra         [bg]or is:genitive
SFX c   0           a          [^bg]or is:genitive
SFX c   0           a          [^eo][cr] is:genitive
SFX c   0           a          [^céior] is:genitive
SFX c   0           mu         [éi] is:dative
SFX c   us          ovi        [^ú]..us is:dative
SFX c   0           ovi        úlius is:dative
SFX c   as          ovi        [^el]as is:dative
SFX c   0           ovi        [el]as is:dative
SFX c   es          ovi        [^hxz]es is:dative
SFX c   0           ovi        [hxz]es is:dative
SFX c   0           ovi        [^h]os is:dative
SFX c   os          ovi        hos is:dative
SFX c   0           ovi        is is:dative
SFX c   ec          cu         ec is:dative
SFX c   on          novi       zon is:dative
SFX c   0           vi         o is:dative
SFX c   0           ovi        [inp]er is:dative
SFX c   er          rovi       [^inp]er is:dative
SFX c   or          rovi       [bg]or is:dative
SFX c   0           ovi        [^bg]or is:dative
SFX c   0           ovi        [^eo][cr] is:dative
SFX c   0           ovi        [^céior] is:dative
SFX c   us          a          [^ú]..us is:accusative
SFX c   0           a          úlius is:accusative
SFX c   as          a          [^el]as is:accusative
SFX c   0           a          [el]as is:accusative
SFX c   es          a          [^hxz]es is:accusative
SFX c   0           a          [hxz]es is:accusative
SFX c   0           a          [^h]os is:accusative
SFX c   os          a          hos is:accusative
SFX c   0           a          is is:accusative
SFX c   ec          ca         ec is:accusative
SFX c   0           a          [^e]c is:accusative
SFX c   o           a          o is:accusative
SFX c   er          ra         [^inp]er is:accusative
SFX c   or          ra         [bg]or is:accusative
SFX c   0           a          [^bg]or is:accusative
SFX c   0           a          [^eo][cr] is:accusative
SFX c   0           a          [^céior] is:accusative
SFX c   0           m          [éi] is:locative
SFX c   0           ovi        [hxz]es is:locative
SFX c   0           ovi        [^h]os is:locative
SFX c   os          ovi        hos is:locative
SFX c   0           ovi        is is:locative
SFX c   ec          covi       ec is:locative
SFX c   on          novi       zon is:locative
SFX c   0           vi         o is:locative
SFX c   0           ovi        [inp]er is:locative
SFX c   er          rovi       [^inp]er is:locative
SFX c   or          rovi       [bg]or is:locative
SFX c   0           ovi        [^bg]or is:locative
SFX c   0           ovi        [^eo][cr] is:locative
SFX c   0           ovi        [^céior] is:locative
SFX c   0           om         [éi] is:instrumental
SFX c   0           ami        [éi] is:instrumental
SFX c   0           om         [^céior] is:instrumental
SFX c   0           ovia       [éi] is:nominative is:plural
SFX c   us          ovia       [^ú]..us is:nominative is:plural
SFX c   0           ovia       úlius is:nominative is:plural
SFX c   as          ovia       [^el]as is:nominative is:plural
SFX c   0           ovia       [el]as is:nominative is:plural
SFX c   es          ovia       [^hxz]es is:nominative is:plural
SFX c   0           ovia       [hxz]es is:nominative is:plural
SFX c   0           ovia       [^h]os is:nominative is:plural
SFX c   os          ovia       hos is:nominative is:plural
SFX c   0           ovia       is is:nominative is:plural
SFX c   ec          covia      ec is:nominative is:plural
SFX c   on          ni         zon is:nominative is:plural
SFX c   on          novia      zon is:nominative is:plural
SFX c   0           via        o is:nominative is:plural
SFX c   0           ovia       [inp]er is:nominative is:plural
SFX c   er          rovia      [^inp]er is:nominative is:plural
SFX c   or          rovia      [bg]or is:nominative is:plural
SFX c   0           ovia       [^bg]or is:nominative is:plural
SFX c   0           ovia       [^eo][cr] is:nominative is:plural
SFX c   0           ovia       nc is:nominative is:plural
SFX c   0           ovia       [^cčéior] is:nominative is:plural
SFX c   0           ovia       [ey]n is:nominative is:plural
SFX c   or          rovia      [gk]or is:nominative is:plural
SFX c   0           ovia       č[ei]k is:nominative is:plural
SFX c   ok          kovia      ok is:nominative is:plural
SFX c   0           ovia       duch is:nominative is:plural
SFX c   0           ovia       ach is:nominative is:plural
SFX c   0           ovia       ť is:nominative is:plural
SFX c   0           ia         dič is:nominative is:plural
SFX c   0           i          dedič is:nominative is:plural
SFX c   0           ia         žel is:nominative is:plural
SFX c   ľ           lia        ľ is:nominative is:plural
SFX c   n           nia        čan is:nominative is:plural
SFX c   0           ia         brat is:nominative is:plural
SFX c   0           ov         [éi] is:genitive is:plural
SFX c   us          ov         [^ú]..us is:genitive is:plural
SFX c   0           ov         úlius is:genitive is:plural
SFX c   as          ov         [^el]as is:genitive is:plural
SFX c   0           ov         [el]as is:genitive is:plural
SFX c   es          ov         [^hxz]es is:genitive is:plural
SFX c   0           ov         [hxz]es is:genitive is:plural
SFX c   0           ov         [^h]os is:genitive is:plural
SFX c   os          ov         hos is:genitive is:plural
SFX c   0           ov         is is:genitive is:plural
SFX c   ec          cov        ec is:genitive is:plural
SFX c   on          nov        zon is:genitive is:plural
SFX c   0           v          o is:genitive is:plural
SFX c   0           ov         [inp]er is:genitive is:plural
SFX c   or          rov        [bg]or is:genitive is:plural
SFX c   0           ov         [^bg]or genitive is:plural
SFX c   0           ov         [^eo][cr] is:genitive is:plural
SFX c   0           ov         [^céior] is:genitive is:plural
SFX c   0           om         [éi] is:dative is:plural
SFX c   us          om         [^ú]..us is:dative is:plural
SFX c   0           om         úlius is:dative is:plural
SFX c   as          om         [^el]as is:dative is:plural
SFX c   0           om         [el]as is:dative is:plural
SFX c   es          om         [^hxz]es is:dative is:plural
SFX c   0           om         [hxz]es is:dative is:plural
SFX c   0           om         [^h]os is:dative is:plural
SFX c   os          om         hos is:dative is:plural
SFX c   0           om         is is:dative is:plural
SFX c   ec          com        ec is:dative is:plural
SFX c   on          nom        zon is:dative is:plural
SFX c   0           m          o is:dative is:plural
SFX c   0           om         [inp]er is:dative is:plural
SFX c   er          rom        [^inp]er is:dative is:plural
SFX c   or          rom        [bg]or is:dative is:plural
SFX c   0           om         [^bg]or is:dative is:plural
SFX c   0           om         [^eo][cr] is:dative is:plural
